Illinois, session 104th, SB4027.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Lottery Law is amended by changing 5Sections 7.1, 7.15, 7.16, 9.1, 10.1, 10.6, 19, 20, 20.1, 24, 6and 27 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1605/7.1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1157.1)8    Sec. 7.1. The Department shall promulgate such rules and 9regulations governing the establishment and operation of a 10State lottery as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes 11of this Act. Such rules and regulations shall be subject to the 12provisions of The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The 13Department shall issue written game rules, play instructions, 14directives, operations manuals, brochures, or any other 15publications necessary to conduct specific games, as 16authorized by rule by the Department. Any written game rules, 17play instructions, directives, operations manuals, brochures, 18or other game publications issued by the Department that 19relate to a specific lottery game shall be maintained as a 20public record in the Department's principal office, and made 21available for public inspection and copying but shall be 22exempt from the rulemaking procedures of the Illinois 23Administrative Procedure Act. However, when such written   SB4027- 2 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1materials contain any policy of general applicability, the 2Department shall formulate and adopt such policy as a rule in 3accordance with the provisions of the Illinois Administrative 4Procedure Act. In addition, the Department shall publish each 5January in the Illinois Register a list of all game-specific 6rules, play instructions, directives, operations manuals, 7brochures, or other game-specific publications issued by the 8Department during the previous year and instructions 9concerning how the public may obtain copies of these materials 10from the Department.11(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11.) 12    (20 ILCS 1605/7.15)13    Sec. 7.15. Verification for Internet program; security for 14Internet lottery accounts. The Department must establish a 15procedure to verify that an individual is 18 years of age or 16older and that the sale of lottery tickets on the Internet is 17limited to transactions that are initiated and received or 18otherwise made exclusively within the State of Illinois, 19unless the federal Department of Justice indicates that it is 20legal for the transactions to originate in states other than 21Illinois. An individual must satisfy the verification 22procedure before he or she may establish one Internet lottery 23account and purchase lottery tickets or shares through the 24Internet pilot program. By rule, the Department shall 25establish funding procedures for Internet lottery accounts and   SB4027- 3 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1shall provide a mechanism to prevent the unauthorized use of 2Internet lottery accounts. If any participant in the pilot 3program violates any provisions of this amendatory Act of the 496th General Assembly or rule established by the Department, 5the participant's winnings shall be forfeited. Such forfeited 6winnings shall be deposited in the Common School Fund.7(Source: P.A. 96-34, eff. 7-13-09; 96-840, eff. 12-23-09.) 8    (20 ILCS 1605/7.16)9    Sec. 7.16. Voluntary self-exclusion program for Internet 10lottery sales. Any resident, or non-resident if allowed to 11participate in the pilot program, may voluntarily prohibit 12themselves from establishing an Internet lottery account. The 13Department shall incorporate the voluntary self-exclusion 14program for Internet lottery accounts into any existing 15self-exclusion program that it operates on the effective date 16of this amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly.17(Source: P.A. 96-34, eff. 7-13-09.) 18    (20 ILCS 1605/9.1)19    Sec. 9.1. Private manager and management agreement.20    (a) As used in this Section:21    "Offeror" means a person or group of persons that responds 22to a request for qualifications under this Section.23    "Request for qualifications" means all materials and 24documents prepared by the Department to solicit the following   SB4027- 4 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1from offerors:2        (1) Statements of qualifications.3        (2) Proposals to enter into a management agreement, 4    including the identity of any prospective vendor or 5    vendors that the offeror intends to initially engage to 6    assist the offeror in performing its obligations under the 7    management agreement.8    "Final offer" means the last proposal submitted by an 9offeror in response to the request for qualifications, 10including the identity of any prospective vendor or vendors 11that the offeror intends to initially engage to assist the 12offeror in performing its obligations under the management 13agreement. 14    "Final offeror" means the offeror ultimately selected by 15the Governor to be the private manager for the Lottery under 16subsection (h) of this Section.17    (b) (Blank). By September 15, 2010, the Governor shall 18select a private manager for the total management of the 19Lottery with integrated functions, such as lottery game 20design, supply of goods and services, and advertising and as 21specified in this Section.22    (c) (Blank). Pursuant to the terms of this subsection, the 23Department shall endeavor to expeditiously terminate the 24existing contracts in support of the Lottery in effect on July 2513, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-37) in 26connection with the selection of the private manager. As part   SB4027- 5 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1of its obligation to terminate these contracts and select the 2private manager, the Department shall establish a mutually 3agreeable timetable to transfer the functions of existing 4contractors to the private manager so that existing Lottery 5operations are not materially diminished or impaired during 6the transition. To that end, the Department shall do the 7following:8        (1) where such contracts contain a provision 9    authorizing termination upon notice, the Department shall 10    provide notice of termination to occur upon the mutually 11    agreed timetable for transfer of functions;12        (2) upon the expiration of any initial term or renewal 13    term of the current Lottery contracts, the Department 14    shall not renew such contract for a term extending beyond 15    the mutually agreed timetable for transfer of functions; 16    or17        (3) in the event any current contract provides for 18    termination of that contract upon the implementation of a 19    contract with the private manager, the Department shall 20    perform all necessary actions to terminate the contract on 21    the date that coincides with the mutually agreed timetable 22    for transfer of functions.23    If the contracts to support the current operation of the 24Lottery in effect on July 13, 2009 (the effective date of 25Public Act 96-34) are not subject to termination as provided 26for in this subsection (c), then the Department may include a   SB4027- 6 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1provision in the contract with the private manager specifying 2a mutually agreeable methodology for incorporation.3    (c-5) The Department shall include provisions in the 4management agreement whereby the private manager shall, for a 5fee, and pursuant to a contract negotiated with the Department 6(the "Employee Use Contract"), utilize the services of current 7Department employees to assist in the administration and 8operation of the Lottery. The Department shall be the employer 9of all such bargaining unit employees assigned to perform such 10work for the private manager, and such employees shall be 11State employees, as defined by the Personnel Code. Department 12employees shall operate under the same employment policies, 13rules, regulations, and procedures, as other employees of the 14Department. In addition, neither historical representation 15rights under the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act, nor 16existing collective bargaining agreements, shall be disturbed 17by the management agreement with the private manager for the 18management of the Lottery. 19    (d) The management agreement with the private manager 20shall include all of the following:21        (1) A term not to exceed 10 years, including any 22    renewals.23        (2) A provision specifying that the Department:24            (A) shall exercise actual control over all 25        significant business decisions; 26            (A-5) has the authority to direct or countermand   SB4027- 7 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1        operating decisions by the private manager at any 2        time;3            (B) has ready access at any time to information 4        regarding Lottery operations;5            (C) has the right to demand and receive 6        information from the private manager concerning any 7        aspect of the Lottery operations at any time; and8            (D) retains ownership of all trade names, 9        trademarks, and intellectual property associated with 10        the Lottery.11        (3) A provision imposing an affirmative duty on the 12    private manager to provide the Department with material 13    information and with any information the private manager 14    reasonably believes the Department would want to know to 15    enable the Department to conduct the Lottery.16        (4) A provision requiring the private manager to 17    provide the Department with advance notice of any 18    operating decision that bears significantly on the public 19    interest, including, but not limited to, decisions on the 20    kinds of games to be offered to the public and decisions 21    affecting the relative risk and reward of the games being 22    offered, so the Department has a reasonable opportunity to 23    evaluate and countermand that decision.24        (5) A provision providing for compensation of the 25    private manager that may consist of, among other things, a 26    fee for services and a performance based bonus as   SB4027- 8 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1    consideration for managing the Lottery, including terms 2    that may provide the private manager with an increase in 3    compensation if Lottery revenues grow by a specified 4    percentage in a given year.5        (6) (Blank).6        (7) A provision requiring the deposit of all Lottery 7    proceeds to be deposited into the State Lottery Fund 8    except as otherwise provided in Section 20 of this Act.9        (8) A provision requiring the private manager to 10    locate its principal office within the State.11        (8-5) A provision encouraging that, pursuant to 12    Section 4 of the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 13    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act, at least 20% of 14    the cost of contracts entered into for goods and services 15    by the private manager in connection with its management 16    of the Lottery, other than contracts with sales agents or 17    technical advisors, be awarded to businesses that are a 18    minority-owned business, a women-owned business, or a 19    business owned by a person with disability, as those terms 20    are defined in the Business Enterprise for Minorities, 21    Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act. 22        (9) A requirement that so long as the private manager 23    complies with all the conditions of the agreement under 24    the oversight of the Department, the private manager shall 25    have the following duties and obligations with respect to 26    the management of the Lottery:  SB4027- 9 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1            (A) The right to use equipment and other assets 2        used in the operation of the Lottery.3            (B) The rights and obligations under contracts 4        with retailers and vendors.5            (C) The implementation of a comprehensive security 6        program by the private manager.7            (D) The implementation of a comprehensive system 8        of internal audits.9            (E) The implementation of a program by the private 10        manager to curb compulsive gambling by persons playing 11        the Lottery.12            (F) A system for determining (i) the type of 13        Lottery games, (ii) the method of selecting winning 14        tickets, (iii) the manner of payment of prizes to 15        holders of winning tickets, (iv) the frequency of 16        drawings of winning tickets, (v) the method to be used 17        in selling tickets, (vi) a system for verifying the 18        validity of tickets claimed to be winning tickets, 19        (vii) the basis upon which retailer commissions are 20        established by the manager, and (viii) minimum 21        payouts.22        (10) A requirement that advertising and promotion must 23    be consistent with Section 7.8a of this Act.24        (11) A requirement that the private manager market the 25    Lottery to those residents who are new, infrequent, or 26    lapsed players of the Lottery, especially those who are   SB4027- 10 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1    most likely to make regular purchases on the Internet as 2    permitted by law.3        (12) A code of ethics for the private manager's 4    officers and employees.5        (13) A requirement that the Department monitor and 6    oversee the private manager's practices and take action 7    that the Department considers appropriate to ensure that 8    the private manager is in compliance with the terms of the 9    management agreement, while allowing the manager, unless 10    specifically prohibited by law or the management 11    agreement, to negotiate and sign its own contracts with 12    vendors.13        (14) A provision requiring the private manager to 14    periodically file, at least on an annual basis, 15    appropriate financial statements in a form and manner 16    acceptable to the Department.17        (15) Cash reserves requirements.18        (16) Procedural requirements for obtaining the prior 19    approval of the Department when a management agreement or 20    an interest in a management agreement is sold, assigned, 21    transferred, or pledged as collateral to secure financing.22        (17) Grounds for the termination of the management 23    agreement by the Department or the private manager.24        (18) Procedures for amendment of the agreement.25        (19) A provision requiring the private manager to 26    engage in an open and competitive bidding process for any   SB4027- 11 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1    procurement having a cost in excess of the small purchase 2    limits under Section 20-20 of the Illinois Procurement 3    Code $50,000 that is not a part of the private manager's 4    final offer. The process shall favor the selection of a 5    vendor deemed to have submitted a proposal that provides 6    the Lottery with the best overall value. The process shall 7    not be subject to the provisions of the Illinois 8    Procurement Code, unless specifically required by the 9    management agreement.10        (20) The transition of rights and obligations, 11    including any associated equipment or other assets used in 12    the operation of the Lottery, from the manager to any 13    successor manager of the lottery, including the 14    Department, following the termination of or foreclosure 15    upon the management agreement.16        (21) Right of use of copyrights, trademarks, and 17    service marks held by the Department in the name of the 18    State. The agreement must provide that any use of them by 19    the manager shall only be for the purpose of fulfilling 20    its obligations under the management agreement during the 21    term of the agreement.22        (22) The disclosure of any information requested by 23    the Department to enable it to comply with the reporting 24    requirements and information requests provided for under 25    subsection (p) of this Section. 26    (e) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the   SB4027- 12 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1Department shall select a private manager through a 2competitive request for qualifications process consistent with 3Section 20-35 of the Illinois Procurement Code, which shall 4take into account:5        (1) the offeror's ability to market the Lottery to 6    those residents who are new, infrequent, or lapsed players 7    of the Lottery, especially those who are most likely to 8    make regular purchases on the Internet;9        (2) the offeror's ability to address the State's 10    concern with the social effects of gambling on those who 11    can least afford to do so;12        (3) the offeror's ability to provide the most 13    successful management of the Lottery for the benefit of 14    the people of the State based on current and past business 15    practices or plans of the offeror; and16        (4) the offeror's poor or inadequate past performance 17    in servicing, equipping, operating or managing a lottery 18    on behalf of Illinois, another State or foreign government 19    and attracting persons who are not currently regular 20    players of a lottery.21    (f) The Department may retain the services of an advisor 22or advisors with significant experience in financial services 23or the management, operation, and procurement of goods, 24services, and equipment for a government-run lottery to assist 25in the preparation of the terms of the request for 26qualifications and selection of the private manager. Any   SB4027- 13 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1prospective advisor seeking to provide services under this 2subsection (f) shall disclose any material business or 3financial relationship during the past 3 years with any 4potential offeror, or with a contractor or subcontractor 5presently providing goods, services, or equipment to the 6Department to support the Lottery. The Department shall 7evaluate the material business or financial relationship of 8each prospective advisor. The Department shall not select any 9prospective advisor with a substantial business or financial 10relationship that the Department deems to impair the 11objectivity of the services to be provided by the prospective 12advisor. During the course of the advisor's engagement by the 13Department, and for a period of one year thereafter, the 14advisor shall not enter into any business or financial 15relationship with any offeror or any vendor identified to 16assist an offeror in performing its obligations under the 17management agreement. Any advisor retained by the Department 18shall be disqualified from being an offeror. The Department 19shall not include terms in the request for qualifications that 20provide a material advantage whether directly or indirectly to 21any potential offeror, or any contractor or subcontractor 22presently providing goods, services, or equipment to the 23Department to support the Lottery, including terms contained 24in previous responses to requests for proposals or 25qualifications submitted to Illinois, another State or foreign 26government when those terms are uniquely associated with a   SB4027- 14 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1particular potential offeror, contractor, or subcontractor. 2The request for proposals offered by the Department on 3December 22, 2008 as "LOT08GAMESYS" and reference number 4"22016176" is declared void.5    (g) The Department shall select at least 2 offerors as 6finalists to potentially serve as the private manager no later 7than August 9, 2010. Upon making preliminary selections, the 8Department shall schedule a public hearing on the finalists' 9proposals and provide public notice of the hearing at least 7 10calendar days before the hearing. The notice must include all 11of the following:12        (1) The date, time, and place of the hearing.13        (2) The subject matter of the hearing.14        (3) A brief description of the management agreement to 15    be awarded.16        (4) The identity of the offerors that have been 17    selected as finalists to serve as the private manager.18        (5) The address and telephone number of the 19    Department.20    (h) At the public hearing, the Department shall (i) 21provide sufficient time for each finalist to present and 22explain its proposal to the Department and the Governor or the 23Governor's designee, including an opportunity to respond to 24questions posed by the Department, Governor, or designee and 25(ii) allow the public and non-selected offerors to comment on 26the presentations. The Governor or a designee shall attend the   SB4027- 15 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1public hearing. After the public hearing, the Department shall 2have 14 calendar days to recommend to the Governor whether a 3management agreement should be entered into with a particular 4finalist. After reviewing the Department's recommendation, the 5Governor may accept or reject the Department's recommendation, 6and shall select a final offeror as the private manager by 7publication of a notice in the Illinois Procurement Bulletin 8on or before September 15, 2010. The Governor shall include in 9the notice a detailed explanation and the reasons why the 10final offeror is superior to other offerors and will provide 11management services in a manner that best achieves the 12objectives of this Section. The Governor shall also sign the 13management agreement with the private manager.14    (i) Any action to contest the private manager selected by 15the Governor under this Section must be brought within 7 16calendar days after the publication of the notice of the 17designation of the private manager as provided in subsection 18(h) of this Section.19    (j) The Lottery shall remain, for so long as a private 20manager manages the Lottery in accordance with provisions of 21this Act, a Lottery conducted by the State, and the State shall 22not be authorized to sell or transfer the Lottery to a third 23party.24    (k) Any tangible personal property used exclusively in 25connection with the lottery that is owned by the Department 26and leased to the private manager shall be owned by the   SB4027- 16 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1Department in the name of the State and shall be considered to 2be public property devoted to an essential public and 3governmental function.4    (l) The Department may exercise any of its powers under 5this Section or any other law as necessary or desirable for the 6execution of the Department's powers under this Section.7    (m) Neither this Section nor any management agreement 8entered into under this Section prohibits the General Assembly 9from authorizing forms of gambling that are not in direct 10competition with the Lottery. The forms of gambling authorized 11by Public Act 101-31 constitute authorized forms of gambling 12that are not in direct competition with the Lottery.13    (n) The private manager shall be subject to a complete 14investigation in the third, seventh, and tenth years of the 15agreement (if the agreement is for a 10-year term) by the 16Department in cooperation with the Auditor General to 17determine whether the private manager has complied with this 18Section and the management agreement. The private manager 19shall bear the cost of an investigation or reinvestigation of 20the private manager under this subsection.21    (o) The powers conferred by this Section are in addition 22and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law. If 23any other law or rule is inconsistent with this Section, 24including, but not limited to, provisions of the Illinois 25Procurement Code, then this Section controls as to any 26management agreement entered into under this Section. This   SB4027- 17 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1Section and any rules adopted under this Section contain full 2and complete authority for a management agreement between the 3Department and a private manager. No law, procedure, 4proceeding, publication, notice, consent, approval, order, or 5act by the Department or any other officer, Department, 6agency, or instrumentality of the State or any political 7subdivision is required for the Department to enter into a 8management agreement under this Section. This Section contains 9full and complete authority for the Department to approve any 10contracts entered into by a private manager with a vendor 11providing goods, services, or both goods and services to the 12private manager under the terms of the management agreement, 13including subcontractors of such vendors.14    Upon receipt of a written request from the Chief 15Procurement Officer, the Department shall provide to the Chief 16Procurement Officer a complete and un-redacted copy of the 17management agreement or any contract that is subject to the 18Department's approval authority under this subsection (o). The 19Department shall provide a copy of the agreement or contract 20to the Chief Procurement Officer in the time specified by the 21Chief Procurement Officer in his or her written request, but 22no later than 5 business days after the request is received by 23the Department. The Chief Procurement Officer must retain any 24portions of the management agreement or of any contract 25designated by the Department as confidential, proprietary, or 26trade secret information in complete confidence pursuant to   SB4027- 18 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1subsection (g) of Section 7 of the Freedom of Information Act. 2The Department shall also provide the Chief Procurement 3Officer with reasonable advance written notice of any contract 4that is pending Department approval. 5    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the 6contrary, the Chief Procurement Officer shall adopt 7administrative rules, including emergency rules, to establish 8a procurement process to select a successor private manager if 9a private management agreement has been terminated. The 10selection process shall at a minimum take into account the 11criteria set forth in items (1) through (4) of subsection (e) 12of this Section and may include provisions consistent with 13subsections (f), (g), (h), and (i) of this Section. The Chief 14Procurement Officer shall also implement and administer the 15adopted selection process upon the termination of a private 16management agreement. The Department, after the Chief 17Procurement Officer certifies that the procurement process has 18been followed in accordance with the rules adopted under this 19subsection (o), shall select a final offeror as the private 20manager and sign the management agreement with the private 21manager. 22    Through June 30, 2022, except as provided in Sections 2321.5, 21.6, 21.7, 21.8, 21.9, 21.10, 21.11, 21.12, and 21.13 24of this Act and Section 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act, the 25Department shall distribute all proceeds of lottery tickets 26and shares sold in the following priority and manner:  SB4027- 19 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1        (1) The payment of prizes and retailer bonuses.2        (2) The payment of costs incurred in the operation and 3    administration of the Lottery, including the payment of 4    sums due to the private manager under the management 5    agreement with the Department.6        (3) On the last day of each month or as soon thereafter 7    as possible, the State Comptroller shall direct and the 8    State Treasurer shall transfer from the State Lottery Fund 9    to the Common School Fund an amount that is equal to the 10    proceeds transferred in the corresponding month of fiscal 11    year 2009, as adjusted for inflation, to the Common School 12    Fund.13        (4) On or before September 30 of each fiscal year, 14    deposit any estimated remaining proceeds from the prior 15    fiscal year, subject to payments under items (1), (2), and 16    (3), into the Capital Projects Fund. Beginning in fiscal 17    year 2019, the amount deposited shall be increased or 18    decreased each year by the amount the estimated payment 19    differs from the amount determined from each year-end 20    financial audit. Only remaining net deficits from prior 21    fiscal years may reduce the requirement to deposit these 22    funds, as determined by the annual financial audit.23    Beginning July 1, 2022, the Department shall distribute 24all proceeds of lottery tickets and shares sold in the manner 25and priority described in Section 9.3 of this Act, except that 26the Department shall make the deposit into the Capital   SB4027- 20 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1Projects Fund that would have occurred under item (4) of this 2subsection (o) on or before September 30, 2022, but for the 3changes made to this subsection by Public Act 102-699. 4    (p) The Department shall be subject to the following 5reporting and information request requirements:6        (1) the Department shall submit written quarterly 7    reports to the Governor and the General Assembly on the 8    activities and actions of the private manager selected 9    under this Section;10        (2) upon request of the Chief Procurement Officer, the 11    Department shall promptly produce information related to 12    the procurement activities of the Department and the 13    private manager requested by the Chief Procurement 14    Officer; the Chief Procurement Officer must retain 15    confidential, proprietary, or trade secret information 16    designated by the Department in complete confidence 17    pursuant to subsection (g) of Section 7 of the Freedom of 18    Information Act; and19        (3) at least 30 days prior to the beginning of the 20    Department's fiscal year, the Department shall prepare an 21    annual written report on the activities of the private 22    manager selected under this Section and deliver that 23    report to the Governor and General Assembly.24(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 25101-561, eff. 8-23-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-699, eff. 264-19-22; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23.)   SB4027- 21 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1    (20 ILCS 1605/10.1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1160.1)2    Sec. 10.1. The following are ineligible for any license 3under this Act: 4        (a) any person who has been convicted of a felony;5        (b) any person who is or has been a professional 6    gambler or gambling promoter;7        (c) any person who has engaged in bookmaking or other 8    forms of illegal gambling;9        (d) any person who is not of good character and 10    reputation in the community in which he resides;11        (e) any person who has been found guilty of any fraud 12    or misrepresentation in any connection;13        (f) any firm or corporation in which a person defined 14    in item (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) has a proprietary, 15    equitable or credit interest of 5% or more; .16        (g) any organization in which a person defined in item 17    (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) is an officer, director, or 18    managing agent, whether compensated or not; and 19        (h) any organization in which a person defined in item 20    (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) is to participate in the 21    management or sales of lottery tickets or shares.22    However, with respect to persons defined in (a), the 23Department may grant any such person a license under this Act 24when:25        1) at least 10 years have elapsed since the date when   SB4027- 22 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1    the sentence for the most recent such conviction was 2    satisfactorily completed;3        2) the applicant has no history of criminal activity 4    subsequent to such conviction;5        3) the applicant has complied with all conditions of 6    probation, conditional discharge, supervision, parole or 7    mandatory supervised release; and8        4) the applicant presents at least 3 letters of 9    recommendation from responsible citizens in his community 10    who personally can attest that the character and attitude 11    of the applicant indicate that he is unlikely to commit 12    another crime.13    The Department may revoke, without notice or a hearing, 14the license of any agent who violates this Act or any rule or 15regulation promulgated pursuant to this Act. However, if the 16Department does revoke a license without notice and an 17opportunity for a hearing, the Department shall, by 18appropriate notice, afford the person whose license has been 19revoked an opportunity for a hearing within 30 days after the 20revocation order has been issued. As a result of any such 21hearing, the Department may confirm its action in revoking the 22license, or it may order the restoration of such license.23(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11.) 24    (20 ILCS 1605/10.6)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1160.6)25    Sec. 10.6. The Department shall make an effort to more   SB4027- 23 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1directly inform players of the odds of winning prizes by 2publishing the information for all games on the Department's 3public website. This effort shall include, at a minimum, that 4the Department require all ticket agents to display a placard 5stating the odds of winning for each game offered by that 6agent.7(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11.) 8    (20 ILCS 1605/19)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1169)9    Sec. 19. The Department shall establish an appropriate 10period for the claiming of prizes for each lottery game 11offered. Each claim period shall be stated in game rules and 12written play instructions issued by the Director in accordance 13with Section 7.1 of this Act. Written play instructions shall 14be made available on the Department's public website or by the 15Department by request. to all players through sales agents 16licensed to sell game tickets or shares. Prizes for lottery 17games which involve the purchase of a physical lottery ticket 18may be claimed only by presentation of a valid winning lottery 19ticket that matches validation records on file with the 20Lottery; no claim may be honored which is based on the 21assertion that the ticket was lost or stolen. No lottery 22ticket which has been altered, mutilated, or fails to pass 23validation tests shall be deemed to be a winning ticket.24    If no claim is made for the money within the established 25claim period, the prize may be included in the prize pool of   SB4027- 24 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1such special drawing or drawings as the Department may, from 2time to time, designate. Unclaimed multi-state game prize 3money may be included in the multi-state prize pool for such 4special drawing or drawings as the multi-state game directors 5may, from time to time, designate. Any bonuses offered by the 6Department to sales agents who sell winning tickets or shares 7shall be payable to such agents regardless of whether or not 8the prize money on the ticket or share is claimed, provided 9that the agent can be identified as the vendor of the winning 10ticket or share, and that the winning ticket or share was sold 11on or after January 1, 1984. All unclaimed prize money not 12included in the prize pool of a special drawing shall be 13transferred to the Common School Fund.14(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11; 98-499, eff. 8-16-13.) 15    (20 ILCS 1605/20)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1170)16    Sec. 20. State Lottery Fund. 17    (a) There is created in the State Treasury a special fund 18to be known as the State Lottery Fund. Such fund shall consist 19of all revenues received from (1) the sale of lottery tickets 20or shares, (net of commissions, fees representing those 21expenses that are directly proportionate to the sale of 22tickets or shares at the agent location, and prizes of less 23than $600 or less which have been validly paid at the agent 24level), (2) application fees, and (3) all other sources 25including moneys credited or transferred thereto from any   SB4027- 25 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1other fund or source pursuant to law. Interest earnings of the 2State Lottery Fund shall be credited to the Common School 3Fund.4    (a-5) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 521.4 of this Act shall be in accordance with Section 21.4. 6    (b) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 721.5 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.5. 8    (c) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 921.6 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.6.10    (d) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1121.7 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.7. 12    (e) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1321.8 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.8. 14    (f) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1521.9 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.9. 16    (g) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1721.10 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.10. 18    (h) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1921.11 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.11. 20    (i) (Blank). 21    (j) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2221.13 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.13.23    (k) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2425-70 of the Sports Wagering Act shall be in accordance with 25Section 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act. 26    (l) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section   SB4027- 26 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b121.15 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.15. 2    (m) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 321.16 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.16.4(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-381, eff. 7-28-23.) 5    (20 ILCS 1605/20.1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1170.1)6    Sec. 20.1. Department account. 7    (a) The Department is authorized to pay validated prizes 8up to $25,000 from funds held by the Department in an account 9separate and apart from all public moneys of the State. Moneys 10in this account shall be administered by the Director 11exclusively for the purposes of issuing payments to prize 12winners authorized by this Section. Moneys in this account 13shall be deposited by the Department into the Public 14Treasurers' Investment Pool established under Section 17 of 15the State Treasurer Act. The Department shall submit vouchers 16from time to time as needed for reimbursement of this account 17from moneys appropriated for prizes from the State Lottery 18Fund. Investment income earned from this account shall be 19deposited monthly by the Department into the Common School 20Fund. The Department shall file quarterly fiscal reports 21specifying the activity of this account as required under 22Section 16 of the State Comptroller Act, and shall file 23quarterly with the General Assembly, the Auditor General, the 24Comptroller, and the State Treasurer a report indicating the 25costs associated with this activity.  SB4027- 27 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1    (b) The Department is authorized to enter into an 2interagency agreement with the Office of the Comptroller or 3any other State agency to establish responsibilities, duties, 4and procedures for complying with the Comptroller's Offset 5System under Section 10.05 of the State Comptroller Act. All 6federal and State tax reporting and withholding requirements 7relating to prize winners under this Section shall be the 8responsibility of the Department. Moneys from this account may 9not be used to pay amounts to deferred prize winners. Moneys 10may not be transferred from the State Lottery Fund to this 11account for payment of prizes under this Section until 12procedures are implemented to comply with the Comptroller's 13Offset System and sufficient internal controls are in place to 14validate prizes.15(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11; 98-499, eff. 8-16-13.) 16    (20 ILCS 1605/24)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1174)17    Sec. 24. The State Comptroller shall conduct a preaudit of 18all accounts and transactions of the Department in connection 19with the operation of the State Lottery under the State 20Comptroller Act, excluding payments issued by the Department 21for prizes of $25,000 or less.22    The Auditor General or a certified public accountant firm 23appointed by him shall conduct an annual post-audit of all 24accounts and transactions of the Department in connection with 25the operation of the State Lottery and other special post   SB4027- 28 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1audits as the Auditor General, the Legislative Audit 2Commission, or the General Assembly deems necessary. The 3annual post-audits shall include payments made by lottery 4sales agents of prizes of less than $600 or less authorized 5under Section 20, and payments made by the Department of 6prizes up to $25,000 authorized under Section 20.1. The 7Auditor General or his agent conducting an audit under this 8Act shall have access and authority to examine any and all 9records of the Department or the Board, its distributing 10agents and its licensees.11(Source: P.A. 94-776, eff. 5-19-06.) 12    (20 ILCS 1605/27)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1177)13    Sec. 27. (a) The Department may The State Treasurer may, 14with the consent of the Director, contract with any person or 15corporation, including, without limitation, a bank, banking 16house, trust company or investment banking firm, to perform 17such financial functions, activities or services in connection 18with operation of the lottery. The State Treasurer may, with 19the consent of the Director, act as an agent of the Department 20to perform the financial functions as the Director may 21prescribe as the State Treasurer and the Director may 22prescribe.23    (b) All proceeds from investments made pursuant to 24contracts executed by the Department or the State Treasurer, 25with the consent of the Director, to perform financial   SB4027- 29 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1functions, activities or services in connection with operation 2of the lottery, shall be deposited and held by the State 3Treasurer as ex-officio custodian thereof, separate and apart 4from all public money or funds of this State in a special trust 5fund outside the State treasury. Such trust fund shall be 6known as the "Deferred Lottery Prize Winners Trust Fund", and 7shall be administered by the Director.8    The Director shall, at such times and in such amounts as 9shall be necessary, prepare and send to the State Comptroller 10vouchers requesting payment from the Deferred Lottery Prize 11Winners Trust Fund to deferred prize winners, in a manner that 12will insure the timely payment of such amounts owed.13    This Act shall constitute an irrevocable appropriation of 14all amounts necessary for that purpose, and the irrevocable 15and continuing authority for and direction to the Director and 16the State Treasurer to make the necessary payments out of such 17trust fund for that purpose.18    (c) Moneys invested pursuant to subsection (a) of this 19Section may be invested only in bonds, notes, certificates of 20indebtedness, treasury bills, or other securities constituting 21direct obligations of the United States of America and all 22securities or obligations the prompt payment of principal and 23interest of which is guaranteed by a pledge of the full faith 24and credit of the United States of America. Interest earnings 25on moneys in the Deferred Lottery Prize Winners Trust Fund 26shall remain in such fund and be used to pay the winners of   SB4027- 30 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1lottery prizes deferred as to payment until such obligations 2are discharged. Proceeds from bonds purchased and interest 3accumulated as a result of a grand prize multi-state game 4ticket that goes unclaimed will be transferred after the 5termination of the relevant claim period directly from the 6lottery's Deferred Lottery Prize Winners Trust Fund to each 7respective multi-state partner state according to its 8contribution ratio.9    (c-5) If a deferred lottery prize is not claimed within 10the claim period established by game rule, then the securities 11or other instruments purchased to fund the prize shall be 12liquidated and the liquidated amount shall be transferred to 13the State Lottery Fund for disposition pursuant to Section 19 14of this Act.15    (c-10) The Director may use a portion of the moneys in the 16Deferred Lottery Prize Winners Trust Fund to purchase bonds to 17pay a lifetime prize if the prize duration exceeds the length 18of available securities. If the winner of a lifetime prize 19exceeds his or her life expectancy as determined using 20actuarial assumptions and the securities or moneys set aside 21to pay the prize have been exhausted, moneys in the State 22Lottery Fund shall be used to make payments to the winner for 23the duration of the winner's life.24    (c-15) From time to time, the Director may request that 25the State Comptroller transfer any excess moneys in the 26Deferred Lottery Prize Winners Trust Fund to the State Lottery   SB4027- 31 -LRB104 20451 LNS 33916 b1Fund.2    (d) This amendatory Act of 1985 shall be construed 3liberally to effect the purposes of the Illinois Lottery Law.4(Source: P.A. 97-464, eff. 10-15-11; 98-463, eff. 8-16-13; 598-499, eff. 8-16-13.) 6    (20 ILCS 1605/10.8 rep.)7    Section 10. The Illinois Lottery Law is amended by 8repealing Section 10.8.